Washington statutes.
RCW 36.04.250

Pacific county.

Pacific county shall consist of the territory bounded as follows, to wit: Commencing at the midchannel of the Columbia river at the point of intersection of the line between ranges eight and nine west; thence north along said line to the north boundary of township ten north; thence east along said boundary to the line between ranges five and six west; thence north along the west boundary of range five west to the northwest corner of section eighteen in township fifteen north, range five west; thence west to the west boundary of the state in the Pacific Ocean; thence southerly along said boundary, including Shoalwater Bay, to a point opposite Cape Disappointment; thence up midchannel of the Columbia river to the place of beginning.

[(i) 1879 p 213 s 1; 1873 p 538 s 1; 1867 p 49 s 1; 1860 p 429 s 1; 1854 p 471 s 1; RRS s 3949. (ii) 1925 ex.s. c 40 s 1; RRS s 3963-1.]